Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1301
Statement of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state to provide adequate electrical service at as low overall cost as possible, consistent with sound business practices and, in furtherance of such policy, electric service should be provided by nonprofit entities including public power districts, public power and irrigation districts, nonprofit electric cooperatives, and municipalities.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 1.